Tennessee statutes. Title 65 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 18

Incline Railroad Companies

65-18-101. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006, ch. 863, § 25, provided that the amendment by that act shall apply only to eminent domain or condemnation proceedings initiated on or after July 1, 2006.

Former § 65-18-101 (Acts 1887, ch. 16, § 2; Shan., § 2247; mod. Code 1932, § 3965; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1801), concerning the right to condemn private property and make surveys, was repealed by Acts 2006, ch. 863, § 13, effective July 1, 2006.

65-18-102. Gauge.

Incline railroad corporations are authorized to adopt such gauge as they may prefer.

Acts 1887, ch. 16, § 2; Shan., § 2248; Code 1932, § 3966; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1802; Acts 2006, ch. 863, § 13.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006, ch. 863, § 25, provided that the amendment by that act shall apply only to eminent domain or condemnation proceedings initiated on or after July 1, 2006.

Cross-References. Power and use of eminent domain, title 29, ch. 17, part 1.

65-18-103. Construction of track across highways, streets and alleys.

The line of track of the road shall be so constructed as not to interfere with the convenient travel of the public along the highways, county roads, streets, and alleys of cities, towns, and villages, and so as to allow carts, wagons, carriages, and other vehicles conveniently and safely to pass over or under the line of track, and so as not to interrupt travel on foot or horseback, or in vehicles of any kind, in the necessary and proper use of the public road, street, or alley in the usual and proper mode.

Acts 1887, ch. 16, § 2; Shan., § 2250; mod. Code 1932, § 3968; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1803.

65-18-104. Crossing signs.

Boards, well supported by posts or otherwise, shall be placed, and constantly kept, across each public road, when the same is crossed on the same level by the track of the railway, the boards to be elevated so as not to obstruct travel, and, on each side of such board, there shall be printed in large letters, easily to be seen by the traveler, the words, “Railroad Crossing — Look Out for the Cars.”

Acts 1887, ch. 16, § 2; Shan., § 2251; Code 1932, § 3969; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1804.

65-18-105. Municipal regulations.

Such boards need not be put up at the crossing of streets and alleys in cities, towns, or villages, but such inclined cable railroad company shall be subject to such proper regulations made by the municipal authorities, in pursuance of general municipal powers, regulating speed, passage, and flaggers in such municipalities; and at crossings, and where there are sidings and switches, the whistle shall always be blown at a distance of not less than two hundred fifty (250) yards from every crossing of a public road.

Acts 1887, ch. 16, § 2; Shan., § 2252; Code 1932, § 3970; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1805.

65-18-106. Private crossings and cowgaps.

Where land on both sides of a track is owned by the same proprietor, convenient crossings shall be made and kept up at the expense of the corporation for the use of the proprietor, and all necessary cowgaps made.

Acts 1887, ch. 16, § 2; Shan., § 2253; Code 1932, § 3971; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1806.

65-18-107. Regulations for running trains — Freight and passengers.

The board of directors shall fix regulations for the running of trains, for the transportation of passengers and property, and shall furnish sufficient accommodation for their safe, comfortable, and convenient transportation, and shall take, transport, and discharge such passengers and property at, from, and to such places, on the due payment of freight tolls, and fare legally authorized to be charged therefor; and, in case of the refusal of the corporation, its officers or agents, to take and transport any passenger, if not by law excused, or property, or to deliver the same, or either of them, at the regular and appointed time, such corporation shall pay to the party aggrieved all damages thereby suffered, with cost of suit. If any passenger refuses to pay the required fare, the conductor may put such passenger off the cars at any station or convenient point where such passenger can step on land. The corporation shall make no contract giving any person a preference in the speedy shipment of freight.

Acts 1887, ch. 16, § 2; Shan., § 2254; Code 1932, § 3972; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1807.

65-18-108. Charge for transportation.

The charge for transportation shall be not exceeding eight cents (8¢) per one hundred pounds (100 lbs.) on heavy articles, and three cents (3¢) per cubic foot on articles of measurement, per mile, and at the same rate for each fraction of a mile, and not exceeding fifty cents (50¢) per mile for each passenger, and at the same rate for each fraction of a mile, with power to make special contracts with shippers and passengers on their roads in regard to rates of freight, and so as not to exceed the amounts herein designated.

Acts 1887, ch. 16, § 2; Shan., § 2249; Code 1932, § 3967; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1808.